Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0742.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. (1) "Gift" means a payment, advance, forbearance, or the rendering or deposit of money, services, or anything of value, the value of which exceeds $25.00, as adjusted under section 19a, in any 1-month period, unless consideration of equal or greater value is received therefor. for the payment, advance, forbearance, or rendering or deposit of money, services, or thing of value. Gift includes a payment, advance, forbearance, or the rendering or deposit of money, services, or anything of value to aid the defense of an official in the legislative branch or an official in the executive branch against a legal action not directly related to the governmental duties of the official. Gift does not include any of the following: (a) A campaign contribution otherwise reported as required by the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.201 to 169.282. (b) A loan made in the normal course of business by an institution, as that term is defined in chapter 1 section 1202 of the banking code of 1999, 1999 PA 276, MCL 487.11101 to 487.11203, 487.11202, a national bank, a branch bank, an insurance company issuing a loan or receiving a mortgage in the normal course of business, a premium finance company, a mortgage company, a small loan company, a state or federal credit union, a savings and loan association chartered by this state or the federal government, or a licensee, as that term is defined by in section 2 of the motor vehicle sales finance act, 1950 (Ex Sess) PA 27, MCL 492.101 to 492.141.492.102. (c) A gift received from a member of the person's individual's immediate family, a relative of a spouse, a relative within the seventh degree of consanguinity as computed by the civil law method, or from the spouse of the relative. (d) A breakfast, luncheon, dinner, or other refreshment consisting of food and beverage provided for immediate consumption. (e) A contribution to a legal defense fund that is registered with the secretary of state under the legal defense fund act, 2008 PA 288, MCL 15.521 to 15.539, and whose the purpose of which is to defend an elected official against any criminal, civil, or administrative action , that arises directly out of the conduct of the elected official's governmental duties. (2) "Immediate family" means a child residing in an individual's household, a spouse of an individual, or an individual claimed by that individual or that individual's spouse as a dependent for federal income tax purposes. (3) "Loan" means a transfer of money, property, or anything of ascertainable value in exchange for an obligation, conditional or not, to repay in whole or in part. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 739 Â of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.